Hawaii statutes.
[§11-403] Notice of complaint;
opportunity to explain or respond to complaint. (a) The commission shall
give notice of receipt of the complaint and a copy of the complaint to the
respondent.

(b) The respondent may explain or otherwise
respond in writing to the complaint and explain or otherwise respond to the
complaint at a meeting promptly noticed by the commission and conducted under
chapter 92. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next